Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-3105
Nonprofit organization; gather and
report performance measures.

The nonprofit organization described in subsection (2) of
section 48-3103 shall ensure the gathering and reporting of the following
performance measures:

(1) Number of employees
participating in the Subsidized Employment Pilot Program;

(2) Length of time
each employee has participated in the program;

(3) Wages paid to employees
in the program;

(4) Employment status of each employee at completion of his or her
participation in the program, six months after such completion, and twelve
months after such completion;

(5) Wages of each employee at completion of his or her participation
in the program, six months after such completion, and twelve months after
such completion;

(6) Number of employers participating in the program; and

(7) Length of time
each employer has participated in the program.

Laws 2013, LB368, § 5.